Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 365 of Title 40, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created until November 1, 2027, the
Rethinking Paying Subminimal Wage to Persons with Disabilities Task
Force.
B. The Task Force shall study and develop a plan to phase out
the practice of paying workers with disabilities subminimum wages
under 14(c) certificate programs in Oklahoma. The Task Force shall
study, review, and make recommendations on the following, with a
focus on transitioning workers with disabilities currently being
paid subminimum wages under 14(c) certificates to competitive,
integrated employment at or above minimum wage, and when
appropriate, alternative meaningful day programs for those not able
or wanting to move to competitive, integrated employment:

1. Identify potential obstacles and negative impacts of phasing
out subminimum wages and 14(c) use in Oklahoma; and
2. Develop a plan for phasing out subminimum wages and 14(c)
use in Oklahoma that:
a. reduces potential negative impacts and maximizes the
potential for successful transition to competitive,
integrated employment,
b. includes alternative meaningful day programs for those
individuals who do not wish to transition to
competitive, integrated employment or for those for
whom it is not appropriate, and
c. establishes an appropriate timeline for phasing out
subminimum wages.
C. The Task Force shall consist of eleven (11) members as
follows:
1. The Secretary of Commerce and Workforce Development;
2. A member of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, appointed
by the Speaker of the House;
3. A member of the Oklahoma State Senate, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore;
4. A representative from the Oklahoma Disability Law Center,
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;
5. A representative from the Oklahoma state chapter of the
Association of People Supporting Employment First, appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
6. A self-advocate who is currently enrolled or previously
employed at subminimum wage, appointed by the Board of the Oklahoma
Developmental Disabilities Council;
7. A parent or family member of a person with a disability who
has successfully transitioned from subminimum wage to competitive,
integrated employment, appointed by the Board of the Oklahoma
Developmental Disabilities Council;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1833 Page 2

8. A director of a program who previously held a 14(c)
certificate and successfully transitioned to community integrated
employment, appointed by the Governor;
9. A private employer who employs individuals with
disabilities, appointed by the Governor;
10. The Director of the Department of Human Services
Developmental Disabilities Services or his or her designee; and
11. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Rehabilitation
Services or his or her designee.
D. The member of the Oklahoma House of Representatives and the
member of the Oklahoma State Senate shall serve as co-chairs of the
Task Force. Appointments to the Task Force shall be made within
thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act. Meetings of
the Task Force shall be held at the call of either co-chair of the
Task Force. Members shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing
authorities. A majority of the members of the Task Force shall
constitute a quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall
impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all of the
powers of the Task Force. Except as otherwise provided, a vacancy
on the Task Force shall be filled by the original appointing
authority. If the original appointing authority fails to make an
appointment within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this
act, a majority of the members of the Task Force who have been
appointed may fill the vacancy to the open position. Staff support
for the Task Force shall be provided by the staff of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives and the Oklahoma State Senate. The
Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education, Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education, Office of Disability Concerns,
Oklahoma Department of Rehabilitation Services, Oklahoma Health Care
Authority, Department of Human Services, and the State Use Committee
of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall provide
support and information as requested by the Task Force.
E. Members of the Task Force shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Task Force, but may receive travel reimbursement,
contingent on the availability of private funds for this purpose.
F. The Task Force may seek the assistance of the Legislative
Service Bureau or the State Board of Education to contract with an
independent consultant as necessary to fulfill the duties specified
in this section, contingent on the availability of funds.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1833 Page 3

G. The Task Force shall submit a final report by January 1,
2028, to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
State Senate, and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1833 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1833 Page 5